Louisiana, session 2026, SB149.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3394.3(D)(6) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3394.3. Authority of board to execute agreements related to the finance of capital
improvements and enhancements; nonprofit corporation;
administration and management of projects
* * *
D. * * *
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection
to the contrary, the Northshore Technical Community College-Hammond Area
Campus project shall not require a match in order to be financed in accordance
with this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 39:1365(7) and (10) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1365. Provisions for bond acts
Each act authorizing the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds by the
state or any of its agencies shall conform to the following provisions:
* * *
(7)(a) Each bid shall be either in writing, signed by the bidder and sealed, or
by facsimile or other electronic transmission device permitted by and pursuant to
procedures which may be established and authorized by the State Bond Commission.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 149 ENROLLED
Each bid, except for bids by the federal government or the state of Louisiana or any
of their respective agencies or corporations, shall be accompanied by either a
certified check or cashier's check for two percent of the par value of the bonds
offered for sale, drawn on a bank or trust company authorized to transact business
in the state of Louisiana or in the state of New York, or a surety bond, in an amount
equal to two percent of the par value of the bonds offered for sale, in the form and
upon such terms and provisions and by such surety bond providers, permitted by and
approved pursuant to procedures which may be established and authorized by the
State Bond Commission, and such check or bond shall be payable to or in favor of
the state treasurer of Louisiana on behalf of the state of Louisiana.
(b) Within the time frame established by the State Bond Commission for
the sale, the winning bidder shall provide for an amount equal to two percent
of the par value of the bonds offered for sale on one of the following:
(i) A wire transfer of funds through the Federal Reserve Bank wire
service originated by a bank or trust company authorized to transact business
in the state of Louisiana or in the state of New York.
(ii) A certified check or cashier's check drawn on a bank or trust
company authorized to transact business in the state of Louisiana or in the state
of New York.
(iii) A surety bond in the form and upon such terms and provisions
approved and authorized by the State Bond Commission.
(c) Any check or bond issued by the winning bidder shall be payable to
or in favor of the state treasurer of Louisiana on behalf of the state of Louisiana.
(d) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to bids by the
federal government or the state of Louisiana or any of their respective agencies
or corporations.
* * *
(10) The dates of maturity and the amount of bonds maturing at each date of
maturity, or the date of sinking fund installments and the amount of each sinking
fund installment shall be determined by the issuing agency. It shall not be necessary
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 149 ENROLLED
that amounts maturing at each date of maturity, or amounts of mandatory sinking
fund installments, either as to principal or principal and interest, be equal. The
maturity dates and mandatory sinking fund installment dates shall be at annual or
semiannual intervals from date of bonds.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.